Utah statutes.
76-8-411.   Trafficking in warrants.

No state, county, city, town, or district officer shall, either directly or indirectly, contract for or purchase any warrant or order issued by the state, county, city, town, or district of which he is an officer, at any discount whatever upon the sum due on the warrant or order, and, if any state, county, city, town, or district officer shall so contract for or purchase any such order or warrant on a discount, he is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

